Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
MEETINGS

7-127-101. Annual and regular meetings.

Unless the bylaws eliminate the requirement for holding an annual meeting, a nonprofit corporation that has voting members shall hold a meeting of the voting members annually at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, or, if not so fixed, at a time and date stated in or fixed in accordance with a resolution of the board of directors.

A nonprofit corporation with members may hold regular membership meetings at a time and date stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, or, if not so fixed, at a time and date stated in or fixed in accordance with a resolution of the board of directors.

Annual and regular membership meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, or, if not so stated or fixed, at a place stated or fixed in accordance with a resolution of the board of directors. If no place is so stated or fixed, annual and regular meetings shall be held at the nonprofit corporation's principal office.

The failure to hold an annual or regular meeting at the time and date determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section does not affect the validity of any corporate action and does not work a forfeiture or dissolution of the nonprofit corporation.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 674, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-127-102. Special meeting.

A nonprofit corporation shall hold a special meeting of its members:

On call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized by the bylaws or resolution of the board of directors to call such a meeting; or

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, if the nonprofit corporation receives one or more written demands for the meeting, stating the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held, signed and dated by members holding at least ten percent of all the votes entitled pursuant to the bylaws to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the meeting.

If not otherwise fixed under section 7-127-103 or 7-127-106, the record date for determining the members entitled to demand a special meeting pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section is the date of the earliest of any of the demands pursuant to which the meeting is called, or the date that is sixty days before the date the first of such demands is received by the nonprofit corporation, whichever is later.

If a notice for a special meeting demanded pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section is not given pursuant to section 7-127-104 within thirty days after the date the written demand or demands are delivered to a corporate officer, regardless of the requirements of subsection (4) of this section, a person signing the demand or demands may set the time and place of the meeting and give notice pursuant to section 7-127-104.

Special meetings of the members may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, or, if not so stated or fixed, at a place stated or fixed in accordance with a resolution of the board of directors. If no place is so stated or fixed, special meetings shall be held at the nonprofit corporation's principal office.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, only business within the purpose or purposes described in the notice of the meeting required by section 7-127-104 (3) may be conducted at a special meeting of the members.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 675, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-127-103. Court-ordered meeting.

The holding of a meeting of the members may be summarily ordered by the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the nonprofit corporation's principal office is located or, if the nonprofit corporation has no principal office in this state, by the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the nonprofit corporation has no registered agent, by the district court for the city and county of Denver:

On application of any voting member entitled to participate in an annual meeting if an annual meeting was required to be held and was not held within the earlier of six months after the close of the nonprofit corporation's most recently ended fiscal year or fifteen months after its last annual meeting; or

On application of any person who participated in a call of or demand for a special meeting effective under section 7-127-102 (1), if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within thirty days after the date of the call or the date the last of the demands necessary to require the calling of the meeting was received by the nonprofit corporation pursuant to section 7-127-102 (1)(b), as the case may be; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, determine the members entitled to participate in the meeting, fix a record date for determining members entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the notice of the meeting, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters, and enter other orders necessary or appropriate to accomplish the holding of the meeting.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 675, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

IP(1) and (2) amended, p. 2338, § 294, effective July 1, 2004.

7-127-104. Notice of meeting.

A nonprofit corporation shall give to each member entitled to vote at the meeting notice consistent with its bylaws of meetings of members in a fair and reasonable manner.

Any notice that conforms to the requirements of subsection (3) of this section is fair and reasonable, but other means of giving notice may also be fair and reasonable when all the circumstances are considered.

Notice is fair and reasonable if:

The nonprofit corporation notifies its members of the place, date, and time of each annual, regular, and special meeting of members no fewer than ten days, or if notice is mailed by other than first class or registered mail, no fewer than thirty days, nor more than sixty days before the meeting date, and if notice is given by newspaper as provided in section 7-121-402 (2), the notice must be published five separate times with the first such publication no more than sixty days, and the last such publication no fewer than ten days, before the meeting date.

Notice of an annual or regular meeting includes a description of any matter or matters that must be approved by the members or for which the members' approval is sought under sections 7-128-501, 7-129-110, 7-130-103, 7-130-201, 7-131-102, 7-132-102, and 7-134-102; and

Unless otherwise provided by articles 121 to 137 of this title or the bylaws, notice of a special meeting includes a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, if an annual, regular, or special meeting of members is adjourned to a different date, time, or place, notice need not be given of the new date, time, or place, if the new date, time, or place is announced at the meeting before adjournment. If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed under section 7-127-106, however, notice of the adjourned meeting must be given under this section to the members of record as of the new record date.

When giving notice of an annual, regular, or special meeting of members, a nonprofit corporation shall give notice of a matter a member intends to raise at the meeting if:

Requested in writing to do so by a person entitled to call a special meeting; and

The request is received by the secretary or president of the nonprofit corporation at least ten days before the nonprofit corporation gives notice of the meeting.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 676, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

(3)(a) amended, p. 623, § 26, effective July 1.

7-127-105. Waiver of notice.

A member may waive any notice required by articles 121 to 137 of this title or by the bylaws, whether before or after the date or time stated in the notice as the date or time when any action will occur or has occurred. The waiver shall be in writing, be signed by the member entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the nonprofit corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records, but such delivery and filing shall not be conditions of the effectiveness of the waiver.

A member's attendance at a meeting:

Waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the member at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting because of lack of notice or defective notice; and

Waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the member objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 677, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-127-106. Record date - determining members entitled to notice and vote.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing a date as the record date for determining the members entitled to notice of a members' meeting. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing such a record date, the board of directors may fix a future date as such a record date. If no such record date is fixed, members at the close of business on the business day preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the business day preceding the day on which the meeting is held are entitled to notice of the meeting.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing a date as the record date for determining the members entitled to vote at a members' meeting. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing such a record date, the board may fix a future date as such a record date. If no such record date is fixed, members on the date of the meeting who are otherwise eligible to vote are entitled to vote at the meeting.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner for determining a date as the record date for the purpose of determining the members entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any other lawful action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing such a record date, the board may fix a future date as the record date. If no such record date is fixed, members at the close of business on the day on which the board adopts the resolution relating thereto, or the sixtieth day prior to the date of such other action, whichever is later, are entitled to exercise such rights.

A record date fixed under this section may not be more than seventy days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of members occurs.

A determination of members entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of members is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board of directors fixes a new date for determining the right to notice or the right to vote, which it must do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty days after the record date for determining members entitled to notice of the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date for notice or voting continues in effect or it may fix a new record date for notice or voting.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 678, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-127-107. Action without meeting.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, any action required or permitted by articles 121 to 137 of this title to be taken at a members' meeting may be taken without a meeting if members entitled to vote thereon unanimously agree and consent to such action in writing.

No action taken pursuant to this section shall be effective unless writings describing and consenting to the action, signed by members sufficient under subsection (1) of this section to take the action and not revoked pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, are received by the nonprofit corporation within sixty days after the date the earliest dated writing describing and consenting to the action is received by the nonprofit corporation. Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, any such writing may be received by the nonprofit corporation by electronically transmitted facsimile or other form of wire or wireless communication providing the nonprofit corporation with a complete copy thereof, including a copy of the signature thereto. Action taken pursuant to this section shall be effective when the last writing necessary to effect the action is received by the nonprofit corporation, unless the writings describing and consenting to the action state a different effective date.

Any member who has signed a writing describing and consenting to action taken pursuant to this section may revoke such consent by a writing signed and dated by the member describing the action and stating that the member's prior consent thereto is revoked, if such writing is received by the nonprofit corporation before the last writing necessary to effect the action is received by the nonprofit corporation.

Subject to subsection (8) of this section, the record date for determining members entitled to take action without a meeting or entitled to be given notice under subsection (7) of this section of action so taken is the date a writing upon which the action is taken pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is first received by the nonprofit corporation.

Action taken under this section has the same effect as action taken at a meeting of members and may be described as such in any document.

In the event voting members are entitled to vote cumulatively in the election of directors, voting members may take action under this section to elect or remove directors only pursuant to section 7-127-208 and only if the required signed writings describing and consenting to the election or removal of the directors are received by the nonprofit corporation.

In the event action is taken under subsection (1) of this section with less than unanimous consent of all members entitled to vote upon the action, the nonprofit corporation or the members taking the action shall, promptly after all of the writings necessary to effect the action have been received by the nonprofit corporation, give notice of such action to all members who were entitled to vote upon the action. The notice shall contain or be accompanied by the same material, if any, that under articles 121 to 137 of this title would have been required to be given to members in or with a notice of the meeting at which the action would have been submitted to the members for action.

The district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the nonprofit corporation's principal office is located or, if the nonprofit corporation has no principal office in this state, the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the nonprofit corporation has no registered agent, the district court for the city and county of Denver may, upon application of the nonprofit corporation or any member who would be entitled to vote on the action at a members' meeting, summarily state a record date for determining members entitled to sign writings consenting to an action under this section and may enter other orders necessary or appropriate to effect the purposes of this section.

All signed written instruments necessary for any action taken pursuant to this section shall be filed with the minutes of the meetings of the members.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 678, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2) and (8) amended, p. 2338, § 295, effective July 1, 2004.

7-127-108. Meetings by telecommunication.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, any or all of the members may participate in an annual, regular, or special meeting of the members by, or the meeting may be conducted through the use of, any means of communication by which all persons participating in the meeting may hear each other during the meeting. A member participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 680, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-127-109. Action by written ballot.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, any action that may be taken at any annual, regular, or special meeting of members may be taken without a meeting if the nonprofit corporation delivers a written ballot to every member entitled to vote on the matter.

A written ballot shall:

State each proposed action; and

Provide an opportunity to vote for or against each proposed action.

Approval by written ballot pursuant to this section shall be valid only when the number of votes cast by ballot equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action, and the number of approvals equals or exceeds the number of votes that would be required to approve the matter at a meeting at which the total number of votes cast was the same as the number of votes cast by ballot.

All solicitations for votes by written ballot shall:

Indicate the number of responses needed to meet the quorum requirements;

State the percentage of approvals necessary to approve each matter other than election of directors;

State the time by which a ballot must be received by the nonprofit corporation in order to be counted; and

Be accompanied by written information sufficient to permit each person casting such ballot to reach an informed decision on the matter.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, a written ballot may not be revoked.

Action taken under this section has the same effect as action taken at a meeting of members and may be described as such in any document.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 680, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2)(a) and (4)(c) amended, p. 2339, § 296, effective July 1, 2004.